Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 8 Employment and Training of Peace Officers
35-8-23.
Basic training course for communications officers; certification requirements; duties of council; rules and regulations.

As used in this Code section, the term “communications officer” means and includes any person employed by the state or a local governmental agency to receive, process, or transmit public safety information and dispatch law enforcement officers, firefighters, medical personnel, or emergency management personnel.

Any person employed on or after July 1, 1995, as a communications officer shall satisfactorily complete a basic training course approved by the council. Persons who are employed on July 1, 1994, shall register with the council and may be certified by voluntarily complying with the certification process. Any person who fails to comply with the registration or certification process of the council shall not perform any duties of a communications officer and may have his or her certificate sanctioned or revoked.

The council shall conduct administrative compliance reviews with respect to the requirements of this Code section. The council, in coordination with the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority, shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the administration and coordination of standards, certification, and compliance reviews consistent with the provisions of this Code section.

On and after July 1, 1998, the basic training course for communications officers shall include training in the use of telecommunications devices for the deaf (TDD’s), and no person shall on or after that date be certified by the council under this Code section unless such person has satisfactorily completed such training.

On and after January 1, 2024, communications officers shall be required to successfully complete training in the delivery of high-quality telephone cardiopulmonary resuscitation (T-CPR) in addition to the basic training otherwise required by this Code section, and on or after that date no person shall be certified by the council under this Code section unless such person has satisfactorily completed such training; provided, however, that the requirements of this subsection shall be satisfied by any communications officer who is certified in emergency medical dispatch, as such term is defined in Code Section 38-3-181. Such training shall follow the most current evidence based nationally recognized guidelines for high-quality telephone cardiopulmonary resuscitation which incorporate recognition protocols for out-of-hospital cardiac arrest, compression-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and continuing education.

The council shall conduct administrative compliance reviews with respect to the requirements of this subsection, including adherence by communications officers and local government agencies, and may adjust state assistance grants issued pursuant to Code Section 46-5-134.2 based on failure to comply with the requirements of this subsection.

By January 1, 2024, the council, in coordination with the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority, shall establish an amount of continuing education units to be annually completed by communications officers. On or after January 1, 2025, no person shall be certified by the council under this Code section unless such person has satisfactorily completed such training.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1355, § 2.1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 540, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 3-1/HB 751; Ga. L. 2022, p. 413, § 1/SB 505.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, inserted “the state or” in the middle of subsection (a); and inserted “, in coordination with the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority,” near the beginning of the second sentence of subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsections (e) and (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(b) The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

35-8-24.
Training requirements for jail officers and juvenile correctional officers.

Any person employed or appointed as a jail officer six months after January 1, 1999, shall not be authorized to serve as a jail officer in any detention facility after a certain date as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section unless such person has successfully completed a training course for jail officers approved by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

Any person employed or appointed as a juvenile correctional officer six months after January 1, 1999, shall not be authorized to serve as a juvenile correctional officer in any juvenile correctional facility after a certain date as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section unless such person has successfully completed a training course for juvenile correctional officers approved by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

Any person employed or appointed as a jail officer or juvenile correctional officer six months after January 1, 1999, shall have a period of six months from the date of initial employment to complete the required training course successfully. Any person who fails to complete such training course successfully within six months of the date of initial employment or appointment as a jail officer or as a juvenile correctional officer shall be prohibited from working as a jail officer in a detention facility or as a juvenile correctional officer in a juvenile correctional facility.

Applicants and persons certified under this Code section shall be subject to the powers and authority of the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council applicable to peace officers as defined in this chapter and shall be required to fulfill all requirements of a peace officer, except the requirements of paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-8-8 and peace officer training requirements applicable to peace officers only.

Persons employed or serving as jail officers or juvenile correctional officers whose employment or service commences prior to and continues on January 1, 1999, are exempt and excused from compliance with the certification provisions of this Code section.

Jail officers or juvenile correctional officers exempt from the certification provisions of this Code section are required to register with the council. The registration shall remain in effect for the period of time said person is employed as a jail officer or as a juvenile correctional officer.

Any registration granted in this Code section shall not become invalid upon termination of employment or appointment as a jail officer or juvenile correctional officer if subsequent employment or appointment as a jail officer or juvenile correctional officer is commenced within 12 months of such prior termination as a jail officer or a juvenile correctional officer.

Any jail officer or juvenile correctional officer exempted from mandatory compliance with this Code section may choose to be certified under this Code section. If so, the council shall have the authority to recognize instruction received by such jail officer or juvenile correctional officer as equivalent to all or part of the instruction required for certification under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 880, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 237, § 3/SB 373.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “January 1, 1999,” was substituted for “the effective date of this Act” in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2), subsection (b), and subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.20.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

35-8-25.
Training and certification of bomb technicians, explosive ordnance disposal technicians, and animal handlers; intergovernmental assistance agreements.

Any person who is employed by an agency or authority of this state or an agency or authority of a political subdivision of this state as a bomb technician, explosive ordnance disposal technician, handler of an animal trained to detect explosives, or any person who is assigned to such duties shall be required to complete successfully a training program prescribed by the council which shall consist of an initial training program, an apprenticeship, and annual recertification.

The council is authorized to award a distinctive device to any person certified as an explosive ordnance disposal technician or as a handler of an animal trained to detect explosives upon completion of the initial training program and apprenticeship period. The council may also establish and award distinctive devices for certified explosive ordnance disposal technicians who qualify as senior or master explosive ordnance disposal technicians. Such devices may be worn on any law enforcement officer’s or fire official’s uniform.

The head of any agency which employs one or more certified bomb technicians, explosive ordnance disposal technicians, handlers of animals trained to detect explosives, or emergency medical technicians or emergency medical professionals who provide medical support of explosive ordnance disposal operations may establish a mutual aid agreement with any other agency for the purpose of assisting with the detection, rendering safe, and disposal of destructive devices as such term is defined by Code Section 16-7-80. Any such mutual aid agreement shall be subject to approval of the governing authority of such agency.

A political subdivision which is aided pursuant to this subsection shall reimburse the political subdivision providing the aid for any loss or damage to equipment other than fair wear and tear and shall pay any expenses incurred in the operation and maintenance of such equipment; provided, however, that no such claim shall be allowed unless, within 60 days after the same is sustained or incurred, the political subdivision providing the aid provides to the chief financial officer of the political subdivision receiving the aid an itemized notice of the claim made under oath. The political subdivision which received the aid shall also pay and reimburse the political subdivision furnishing the aid for any overtime compensation paid to any employee furnished under this Code section during the time of the rendering of the aid and shall defray the actual traveling and maintenance expenses of any employee while such employee was engaged in rendering the aid. Such reimbursement shall include any amounts paid or due for compensation due to personal injury or death while such employee was engaged in rendering the aid.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by its terms, a mutual aid agreement established pursuant to this subsection shall not be construed as superseding or amending any mutual aid agreement adopted pursuant to Chapter 6 of Title 25, Chapter 69 of Title 36, or Chapter 3 of Title 38 which applies to emergencies involving explosives or destructive devices.

Whenever a bomb technician, explosive ordnance disposal technician, handler of an animal trained to detect explosive devices, or an emergency medical technician or emergency medical professional who provides medical support of explosive ordnance disposal operations employed by an agency or authority of local government provides assistance at the request of a state agency or authority, such person shall be considered an employee of this state for the purposes of Code Section 50-21-22, paragraph (3) of Code Section 34-9-1, and Code Section 45-9-3. Such person shall also be entitled to reimbursement by the requesting agency or authority for actual expenses incurred in the same manner as other employees of the agency or authority.

A state agency or authority receiving assistance from an agency or authority of a local government shall reimburse such political subdivision for any loss or damage, other than fair wear and tear, to any equipment owned by such political subdivision. No claim for the loss, damage, or expense shall be allowed unless, within 60 days after the same is sustained or incurred, the local government submits an itemized notice of the claim under oath to the fiscal officer of the state agency or authority.

A state agency or authority which receives aid from a local government shall also pay and reimburse such political subdivision for any overtime compensation paid to an employee furnished under this Code section during the time of the rendering of the aid. Such reimbursement shall include any amounts paid or due for compensation due to personal injury or death while such employee was engaged in rendering the aid.

An employee of a political subdivision or agency or authority thereof who is engaged in the rendering of outside aid pursuant to a mutual aid agreement adopted pursuant to this Code section shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if such employee was engaged in the performing of his or her duties in the political subdivisions in which he or she is normally employed.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any records, books, or documents, as such terms are defined by subsection (e) of Code Section 45-11-1, which are prepared for use in any training program conducted pursuant to the provisions of this Code section and any rules or regulations relating to such training which contain or may disclose techniques and procedures for the manufacture or rendering safe of any destructive device, as such term is defined by Code Section 16-7-80, or would disclose guidelines for law enforcement investigations or prosecutions of violations of the laws of this state or of the United States relating to destructive devices, explosives, or chemical, biological, or nuclear materials shall not be subject to public disclosure pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 11 of Title 9 or Chapter 16 of Title 17 or Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 unless the request for disclosure is served on the Attorney General as provided by Code Section 9-10-2 and a judge of the superior court finds that such disclosure is required to prevent a manifest injustice and that the information is not available from any other source. Any such order requiring disclosure shall impose such restrictions on access or copying of the material as will ensure that such material is not disclosed beyond that required to preserve the rights of the parties. Any order requiring disclosure of such material may be appealed by the district attorney of the circuit in which such order is entered or by the Attorney General.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 416, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 160, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “paragraph (3) of Code Section 34-9-1” was substituted for “subsection (3) of Code Section 34-9-1” in paragraph (c)(1).

Law reviews.

For review of 1996 damage to and intrusion upon property legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 108 (1996).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 179 (1997).

35-8-26.
[For effective date, see note.] TASER and electronic control weapons; requirements for use; establishment of policies; training.

This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the “TASER and Electronic Control Weapons Act.”

It is the intent and purpose of the Georgia General Assembly to establish legal requirements for the official use of electronic control weapons and similar devices by law enforcement officers, including those officers employed in detention facilities, which requirements shall be consistent with generally accepted industry practices. It is the further intent of the General Assembly to require that such devices, commonly referred to as TASERs or stun-guns, which disrupt the central nervous system of the human body, be used for law enforcement purposes in a manner consistent with established standards and with federal and state constitutional provisions.

A law enforcement unit authorizing the use of electronic control weapons or similar devices shall establish lawful written policies and directives providing for the use and deployment of such weapons and devices that are consistent with the training requirements established by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council. The policies and directives required by this subsection shall be issued prior to the issuance of such devices.

(For effective date, see note.) Prior to the official use of electronic control weapons or similar devices, peace officers authorized by the officer’s law enforcement unit to use such devices shall be required to satisfactorily complete a course of instruction and certification requirements approved by the council. All persons certified to use electronic control weapons shall complete an update or refresher training course of such duration and at such time as may be prescribed by the council in order for their electronic control weapons certification to remain in force and effect.

A department head authorizing the use of an electronic control weapon or similar device or a peace officer using an electronic control weapon or similar device in violation of this Code section shall be subject to disciplinary action as provided for in this chapter. The council is authorized to withdraw or suspend the certification to operate an electronic control weapon of any person for failure to meet the update or refresher requirements specified in this Code section or for violation of any portion of this chapter relating to conditions which may lead to the withdrawal, suspension, or probation of a peace officer’s certification.

(For effective date, see note.) The Georgia Public Safety Training Center shall provide council approved training to peace officers for the use of electronic control weapons and similar devices.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 666, § 1/HB 1019.

Delayed effective date.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 666, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2007, excepting that provisions applying to council certification and provisions for training offered by the Georgia Public Safety Training Center shall become effective six months after the effective date of an appropriations Act containing a specific appropriation to fund certification by the council and training by the center.” Funds were not appropriated at the 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, or 2022 sessions of the General Assembly.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective January 1, 2007, except for subsections (d) and (f). For effective date of these subsections, see the delayed effective date note.

35-8-27.
Training requirements for school resource officers.

It is the best practice for any person assigned or appointed as a school resource officer to successfully complete a training course for school resource officers approved by the council.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this Code section, the council shall maintain a training course consisting of 40 hours of training for school resource officers. Such training course shall, at a minimum, provide training in the role of a peace officer assigned to an elementary or secondary school, search and seizure in elementary and secondary schools, criminal offenses, gang awareness, drug awareness, interviews and interrogations, emergency preparedness, and interpersonal interactions with adolescents, including the encountering of mental health issues.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 1-2/SB 149.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.